Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.126

Recovery of overpayments.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any overpayments previously recovered under the provisions of RCW 7.68.073 as now or hereafter amended shall be limited to six months' overpayments. Where greater recovery has already been made, the director, in his or her discretion, may make restitution in those cases where an extraordinary hardship has been created.

[ 2011 c 346 s 702.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.